Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1918
Complaint tracking system.

The department shall maintain a complaint tracking system which shall identify licensing violations discovered from a complaint investigation, an unannounced inspection, or a self-report investigation for licensees under the Child Care Licensing Act.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 81;

Laws 2026, LB912, § 27.
July 18, 2026